Hawaii statutes.
§171-39 Leases; forfeiture. Upon the
violation of any condition or term of any lease to be observed or performed by
the lessee or tenant, the board of land and natural resources shall, after the
notice of default as provided in section 171-20, and subject to the rights of
each holder of record having a security interest as provided in section 171-21,
terminate the lease or tenancy and take possession of the leased land, without
demand or previous entry and without legal process, together with all improvements
placed thereon and shall retain all rent paid in advance as damages for the
violations. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-39; HRS §171-39]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next